Hawaii statutes.
[§269-16.4] Annual fuel mix disclosure.
(a) Beginning June 1, 2004, and every June 1 thereafter, each retail supplier
of electricity shall disclose fuel mix information by generation category to
its existing and new retail electricity customers for the prior calendar year.

(b) Beginning June 1, 2004, and every June 1
thereafter, each retail supplier of electricity shall state the average retail
price of electricity (per kilowatt-hour) for each rate class of service for the
prior calendar year. The average retail price of electricity for each rate
class of service shall be determined by dividing the total electric revenues
for each rate class of service by the total kilowatt-hours sold to each
respective rate class.

(c) The disclosure required by this section
shall be:

(1) Printed either on the customer's bill or as a
bill insert; provided that this disclosure requirement shall not result in
increased costs to ratepayers; and

(2) Posted and updated on the supplier's internet
website, if any.

(d) As used in this section, the term
"fuel mix" means the electricity sold to retail electricity customers
expressed in terms of percentage contribution by generation category. The
total fuel mix included in each disclosure shall total one hundred per cent. [L
2003, c 147, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next